Utah, session 2026, HB84.
Section 1. Section 53-5a-102.2 is amended to read:53-5a-102.2. Open and concealed carry of a firearm outside of an individual's residence.(1)To effectuate the Second Amendment to the United States Constitution and Utah Constitution, Article I, Section 6, that prohibit the infringement of the right of the people of Utah to keep and bear arms for security and defense of self, family, others, property, or the state, as well as for other lawful purposes, and consistent with the Legislature's ability to define the lawful use of arms:(a)subject to Subsections (2)(a) and (b), an individual 18 years old or older but younger than 21 years old without a provisional concealed carry permit issued under Section 53-5a-305 and who may otherwise lawfully possess firearms, may only carry in an open manner:(i)an unloaded rifle, shotgun, or muzzle-loading rifle in a vehicle in which the individual is lawfully present;(ii)an unloaded or loaded handgun in a vehicle in which the individual is lawfully present; and(iii)an unloaded firearm that the individual may otherwise lawfully carry,:(A) on a public street; or(B)in any other public location not prohibited by, or in accordance with, state statute or federal law;(b)subject to Subsections (2)(a) and (b),Subsection (2)(b), an individual 21 years old or older who may otherwise lawfully possess firearms, may open or conceal carry, without a conceal carry permit:(i)an unloaded or loaded firearm:(A)on a public street; or(B)in any other place not prohibited by, or pursuant to, state statute or federal law;(ii)an unloaded or loaded handgun in a vehicle in which the individual is lawfully present; and(iii)an unloaded rifle, shotgun, or muzzle-loading rifle in a vehicle in which the individual is lawfully present; and(c)subject to Subsections (2)(c) and (d), an individual 18 years old or older with a concealed carry permit issued under Section 53-5a-303, a temporary concealed carry permit issued under Section 53-5a-304, a provisional concealed carry permit issued under Section 53-5a-305, or a concealed carry permit lawfully issued by or in another state, who may otherwise lawfully possess firearms, may open or conceal carry a loaded or unloaded firearm:(i)in a vehicle in which the individual is lawfully present;(ii)on a public street; or(iii)in any other place not prohibited by, or pursuant to, state statute or federal law.(2)(a)An individual openly carrying a firearm 18 years old or older but younger than 21 years old under Subsection (1)(a) or (b) without a provisional concealed carry permit issued under Section 53-5a-305 may not carry thea firearm in any manner:(i)in a secure area established in accordance with Section 76-8-311.1 in which dangerous weapons are prohibited and notice of the prohibition is posted;(ii)on or about the premises of a public or private elementary school or secondary school as described in Section 76-11-205;(iii)on or about the premises of an institution of higher education as described in Section 76-11-205.5;(iv)on or about the premises of a daycare as described in Section 76-11-206;(v)in an airport secure area as described in Section 76-11-218;(vi)in a house of worship or in any private residence where dangerous weapons are prohibited as described in Section 76-11-219; or(vii)in any other place prohibited by, or pursuant to, another state statute or federal law.(b)An individual 21 years old or older concealing a firearm without a concealed carry permit under Subsection (1)(b) may not:(i) carry thea firearm in any manner:(i)(A)in a secure area established in accordance with Section 76-8-311.1 in which dangerous weapons are prohibited and notice of the prohibition is posted;(ii)(B)on or about the school premises of a public or private elementary school or secondary school as described in Section 76-11-205;(iii)on or about the premises of an institution of higher education as described in Section 76-11-205.5;(iv)(C)on or about a daycare premises as described in Section 76-11-206;(v)(D)in an airport secure area as described in Section 76-11-218;(vi)(E)in a house of worship or in any private residence where dangerous weapons are prohibited as described in Section 76-11-219; or(vii)(F)in any other place prohibited by, or pursuant to, another state statute or federal law.; or(ii)openly carry a firearm, unless lawfully responding to an active threat in accordance with Section 76-2-402, 76-2-405, or 76-2-407, on or about the premises of an institution of higher education as described in Section 76-11-205.5.(c)Subject to Subsection (2)(d), an individual with a concealed carry permit under Subsection (1)(c) may not :(i)carry thea firearm in any manner:(i)(A)in a secure area established in accordance with Section 76-8-311.1 in which dangerous weapons are prohibited and notice of the prohibition posted;(ii)(B)in an airport secure area as described in Section 76-11-218;(iii)(C)in a house of worship or in any private residence where dangerous weapons are prohibited as described in Section 76-11-219; or(iv)(D)in any other place prohibited by, or pursuant to, another state statute or federal law.; or(ii)openly carry a firearm, unless lawfully responding to an active threat in accordance with Section 76-2-402, 76-2-405, or 76-2-407:(A)on or about the premises of a public or private elementary school or secondary school as described in Section 76-11-205; or(B)on or about the premises of an institution of higher education as described in Section 76-11-205.5.(d)In addition to the locationsrestrictions described in Subsection (2)(c):(i)an individual 18 years old but younger than 21 years old with a provisional concealed carry permit under Section 53-5a-304 may not carry thea firearm in any manner on or about the premises of a public or private elementary school or secondary school as described in Section 76-11-205; and(ii)an individual concealing a firearm only with only a concealed carry permit lawfully issued by or in another state may not carry thea firearm in any manner:(A)on or about the premises of a public or private elementary school or secondary school as described in Section 76-11-205; or(B)on or about the premises of an institution of higher education as described in Section 76-11-205.5; or(C)(B)on or about the premises of a daycare as described in Section 76-11-206.(3)This section does not prohibit:(a)the owner or lawful possessor of a vehicle from prohibiting another individual from carrying a firearm in the owner or lawful possessor's vehicle; or(b)except as provided in Section 53-5a-102.3, the owner or lawful lessee of private real property from prohibiting another individual from possessing a firearm on the property.(4)An individual is lawfully present in a vehicle while carrying a firearm under this section if:(a)the vehicle is in the lawful possession of the individual; or(b)the individual has the consent of the person lawfully in possession of the vehicle to carry the firearm in the vehicle.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53H-3-902 is amended to read:53H-3-902. Power of board and institutions to adopt rules and enact regulations.(1)As used in this section, "face covering" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53G-9-210.(2)(a)The board may enact regulations governing the conduct of university and college students, faculty, and employees.(b)A president in consultation with the board of trustees, may enact policies governing the conduct of university and college students, faculty, and employees.(3)(a)An institution may enact traffic, parking, and related policies governing all individuals on campus and facilities owned or controlled by the institution.(b)(i)The board and an institution may not require proof of vaccination as a condition for enrollment or attendance within the system of higher education unless the board or an institution allows for the following exemptions:(A)a medical exemption if the student provides to the institution a statement that the claimed exemption is for a medical reason; and(B)a personal exemption if the student provides to the institution a statement that the claimed exemption is for a personal or religious belief.(ii)An institution that offers both remote and in-person learning options may not deny a student who is exempt from a requirement to receive a vaccine under Subsection (3)(b)(i) to participate in an in-person learning option based upon the student's vaccination status.(iii)Subsections (3)(b)(i) and (ii) do not apply to a student studying in a medical setting at an institution of higher education.(iv)Nothing in this section restricts a state or local health department from acting under applicable law to contain the spread of an infectious disease.(c)(i)The board or an institution may not require an individual to wear a face covering as a condition of attendance for in-person instruction, institution-sponsored athletics, institution-sponsored extracurricular activities, in dormitories, or in any other place on a campus of an institution within the system of higher education at any time after the end of the spring semester in 2021.(ii)Subsection (3)(c)(i) does not apply to an individual in a medical setting at an institution of higher education.(4)The board shall enact regulations that require all testimony be given under oath during an employee grievance hearing for a non-faculty employee of an institution of higher education if the grievance hearing relates to the non-faculty employee's:(a)demotion; or(b)termination.(5)Acknowledging that the Legislature has the authority to regulate, by law, firearms at higher education institutions, the board may:(a)authorize higher education institutions to establish no more than one secure area at each institution as a hearing room in accordance with Section 76-8-311.1, but not otherwise restrict the lawful possession or carrying of firearms; and(b)authorize a higher education institution to make a policy that allows a resident of a dormitory located at the institution to request only roommates who are not licensed to carry a concealed firearm under Section 53-5a-303 or Section 53-5a-305choose not to possess firearms in the resident's dorm that the roommates may otherwise lawfully possess in the dormitory.(6)In addition to the requirements and penalty prescribed in Sections 76-8-311.1 and 76-8-311.2, the board shall make rules to ensure:(a)the use of reasonable means such as mechanical, electronic, x-ray, or similar devices, to detect firearms, ammunition, or dangerous weapons contained in the personal property of or on the person of any individual attempting to enter a secure area hearing room;(b)that an individual required or requested to attend a hearing in a secure area hearing room is notified in writing of the requirements related to entering a secure area hearing room under this Subsection (6)(b) and Section 76-8-311.1;(c)that the restriction of firearms, ammunition, or dangerous weapons in the secure area hearing room is in effect only during the time the secure area hearing room is in use for hearings and for a reasonable time before and after the hearing; and(d)the application of reasonable space limitations to the secure area hearing room as the number of individuals involved in a typical hearing warrants.(7)The board and institutions may enforce the rules, regulations, and policies described in this section in any reasonable manner, including the assessment of fees, fines, and forfeitures, through:(a)withholding from money owed the violator;(b)the imposition of probation, suspension, or expulsion from the institution;(c)the revocation of privileges;(d)the refusal to issue certificates, degrees, and diplomas;(e)judicial process; or(f) any reasonable combination of the alternatives described in this Subsection (7).

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 76-11-205 is amended to read:76-11-205. Carrying a dangerous weapon at an elementary school or secondary school.(1)(a)As used in this section, "on or about school premises" means:(i)in a public or private elementary school or secondary school; or(ii)on the grounds of a private elementary school or secondary school.(b)Terms defined in Sections 76-1-101.5, 76-11-101, and 76-11-201 apply to this section.(2)An actor commits carrying a dangerous weapon at an elementary school or secondary school if the actor:(a)is not an individual listed in Subsection (4);(b)carries a dangerous weapon on or about school premises; and(c)knows or reasonably believes that the actor is on or about school premises at the time the actor carries the dangerous weapon.(3)(a)A violation of Subsection (2) is a class B misdemeanor if the dangerous weapon carried by the actor is not a firearm.(b)A violation of Subsection (2) is a class A misdemeanor if the dangerous weapon carried by the actor is a firearm.(4)This section does not apply if:(a)the actor is an individual exempt from certain weapons laws as described in Section 53-5a-108;(b)the actor is 21 years old or older and has a concealed carry permit as described in Section 53-5a-303 and is carrying the actor's dangerous weapon in a concealed manner unless lawfully responding to an active threat in accordance with Section 76-2-402, 76-2-405, or 76-2-407;(c)the actor is 21 years old or older and has a temporary concealed carry permit issued under Section 53-5a-305 and is carrying the actor's dangerous weapon in a concealed manner unless lawfully responding to an active threat in accordance with Section 76-2-402, 76-2-405, or 76-2-407;(d)the actor is carrying the dangerous weapon at the actor's place of residence or on the actor's real property;(e)the possession of the dangerous weapon is approved by the responsible school administrator;(f)the dangerous weapon is present or to be used in connection with a lawful, approved activity and is in the possession or under the control of the actor responsible for the dangerous weapon's possession or use; (g)the actor is an armed school security guard as described in Section 53G-8-704; or(h)the actor is carrying the dangerous weapon in a vehicle lawfully under the actor's control, not including a vehicle owned by the school or used by the school to transport students.(5)This section does not:(a)prohibit prosecution of another criminal offense that may occur on or about school premises; or(b)prevent an actor from securely storing a firearm on the grounds of a school if the actor:(i)participates in: (A)the school guardian program created in Section 53-22-105; or(B)the Educator-Protector Program created in Section 53-22-107; and(ii)complies with the requirements for securely storing the firearm described in Subsection 53-22-107(5)(a).

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 76-11-205.5 is amended to read:76-11-205.5. Openly carrying a dangerous weapon at an institution of higher education.(1)(a)As used in this section,:(i)"Institution of higher education" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53H-1-101.(ii) "on"On or about school premises" means:(a)(A)in a public or private an institution of higher education; or(b)(B)on the grounds of a public or privatean institution of higher education.(b)Terms defined in Sections 76-1-101.5, 76-11-101, and 76-11-201 apply to this section.(2)An actor commits openly carrying a dangerous weapon at an institution of higher education if the actor:(a)is not an individual listed in Subsection (4);(b)(a)the actor intentionally carries a dangerous weapon on or about school premises; and(b)the actor intentionally carries the dangerous weapon in a manner that the dangerous weapon is visible to the ordinary observation of a reasonable person;(c)the dangerous weapon is not covered, hidden, or secreted in a way that would make the dangerous weapon's presence unobservable to the ordinary observation of a reasonable person; and(c)(d)the actor knows, or reasonably believes, that the actor is on or about school premises at the time the actor carries the dangerous weapon.(3)(a)A violation of Subsection (2) is a class B misdemeanor if the dangerous weapon carried by the actor is not a firearm.(b)A violation of Subsection (2) is a class A(C) misdemeanor if the dangerous weapon carried by the actor is a firearm.(4)This section does not apply if:(a)the actor is an individual exempt from certain weapons laws as described in Section 53-5a-108;(b)the actor is lawfully concealing the dangerous weapon and accidentally or inadvertently exposes the dangerous weapon to public view;(c)the actor is openly carrying the dangerous weapon while lawfully responding to an active threat in accordance with Section 76-2-402, 76-2-405, or 76-2-407;(b)the actor has a concealed carry permit as described in Section 53-5a-303;(c)the actor has a provisional concealed carry permit as described in Section 53-5a-304;(d)the actor has a temporary concealed carry permit issued under Section 53-5a-305;(e)(d)the actor is openly carrying the dangerous weapon at the actor's place of residence or on the actor's real property;(f)(e)the possession of the dangerous weaponopen carrying of the dangerous weapon is approved by the responsible school administrator;(g)(f)the dangerous weapon is present or to be used in connection with a lawful, approved activity and is in the possession or under the control of the actor responsible for the dangerous weapon's possession or use; or(h)(g)the actor is openly carrying the dangerous weapon in a vehicle lawfully under the actor's control, not including a vehicle owned by the school or used by the school to transport students.(5)This section does not prohibit prosecution of another criminal offense that may occur on or about school premises.

Section 5:
Section 5.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.